Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1179
Member of any commission, committee, or board created in compliance with federal action; expenses; reimbursement from federal funds.

If the creation of any state commission, council, committee, or board is necessary for the purpose of compliance with acts of Congress, or federal rules and regulations resulting from such acts, the members thereof shall be entitled to be reimbursed for expenses incurred from federal funds available to pay such expenses.

Laws 1977, LB 365, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-306.07.